Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1567
Discovery of property of debtor; examination; debtor's incriminating answers; not privileged; immunity.

No person shall, on examination pursuant to sections 25-1564 to 25-1580, be excused from answering any question on the ground that his examination will tend to convict him of a fraud, but his answer shall not be used as evidence against him in a prosecution for such fraud.

R.S.1867, Code § 536, p. 488;

R.S.1913, § 8115;

C.S.1922, § 9051;

C.S.1929, § 20-1569;

R.S.1943, § 25-1567.